Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-511
Benefits extended to children in rural districts.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall extend the assistance and services herein provided for to all children in rural districts throughout this state, in order that the same benefits and facilities shall be available to children in such districts as in urban areas.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 30, § 11, p. 184;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 43-511;

R.S.1943, § 43-511;

Laws 1982, LB 522, § 12;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 155;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 114.